Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5811HV (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. 2637 Section 1. Section 80F.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. This section shall not be construed to 3 require the disclosure, use, or consideration of a confidential 4 communication protected under chapter 622C in any informal 5 inquiry, formal administrative investigation, disciplinary 6 proceeding, or Brady-Giglio determination. 7 Sec. 2. Section 622.10, subsection 9, paragraph a, Code 8 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9 a. A peer support group counselor or individual present 10 for a individual or group crisis intervention who obtains 11 information from an officer or a civilian employee of a law 12 enforcement agency , emergency management agency, emergency 13 medical services agency, or fire department by reason of the 14 counselorâs capacity as a peer support group counselor or 15 an individualâs presence for a individual or group crisis 16 intervention shall not be allowed , in giving testimony, to 17 disclose any confidential communication properly entrusted 18 to the counselor or individual present for a group crisis 19 intervention by the officer or civilian employee while 20 receiving counseling or group crisis intervention pursuant to 21 chapter 622C except as provided pursuant to section 622C.2, 22 subsection 3 . 23 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 622C.1 Definitions. 24 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 25 requires: 26 1. âCivilian employeeâ means an employee of a law 27 enforcement agency, emergency management agency, emergency 28 medical services agency, or fire department who is not an 29 officer. 30 2. âConfidential communicationâ means any oral, written, or 31 recorded communication made by an officer or civilian employee 32 to a peer support counselor while receiving peer support 33 services or crisis intervention, whether the communication is 34 made individually or in a group setting. 35 -1- LSB 5811HV (2) 91 lh/jh 1/ 4 H.F. 2637 3. âOfficerâ means a certified law enforcement officer, 1 fire fighter, fire marshal, emergency medical technician, 2 paramedic, medical provider, corrections officer, detention 3 officer, jailer, probation or parole officer, public safety 4 telecommunicator, dispatcher, emergency management coordinator 5 under chapter 29C, or any other public safety employee 6 certified by the Iowa law enforcement academy or state fire 7 marshal and employed by a city, county, or state agency. 8 4. âPeer support counselorâ means a law enforcement officer, 9 fire fighter, emergency medical services provider, public 10 safety telecommunicator, dispatcher, civilian employee of a law 11 enforcement or fire department, or a nonemployee counselor who 12 has been designated as a peer support counselor by a sheriff, 13 police chief, fire chief, emergency medical services director, 14 or department head of a public safety agency, and who has 15 received training to provide emotional and moral support, 16 counseling, or crisis intervention to officers and civilian 17 employees affected by stress or trauma arising from official 18 duties. 19 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 622C.2 Confidential peer support 20 communications ââ exceptions. 21 1. Except as provided in subsection 3, a peer support 22 counselor or individual who is present for a confidential 23 communication from an officer or civilian employee during 24 a peer support or crisis intervention session shall not be 25 permitted to testify or otherwise disclose any confidential 26 communication properly entrusted to the peer support counselor 27 or individual, or made in the peer support counselorâs or 28 individualâs presence by an officer or civilian employee 29 receiving peer support services. 30 2. Except as provided in subsection 3, a confidential 31 communication obtained by a peer support counselor during 32 the provision of peer support services or by an individual 33 present for a confidential communication shall not be used 34 or introduced in any formal administrative investigation, 35 -2- LSB 5811HV (2) 91 lh/jh 2/ 4 H.F. 2637 disciplinary proceeding, or Brady-Giglio disclosure or 1 proceeding. 2 3. A peer support counselor or an individual present for a 3 confidential communication may testify or otherwise disclose a 4 confidential communication if the confidential communication 5 includes any of the following: 6 a. A plan for the commission of a crime or information 7 related to the commission of a crime by the officer or civilian 8 employee. 9 b. An explicit threat of harm to the officer, civilian 10 employee, or to another person. 11 c. Information for which disclosure is otherwise required by 12 law, including but not limited to mandatory reporting of child 13 abuse or dependent adult abuse. 14 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 622C.3 Construction. 15 1. This chapter shall not be construed to limit an 16 employerâs authority to direct an employee to an employee 17 assistance program or to require a fitness-for-duty evaluation. 18 2. This chapter shall be construed liberally to promote 19 candid and confidential communications during peer support 20 services for public safety professionals. 21